Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 2. Formation: Certificate of Limited Partnership.

§ 50-73.11.
Certificate of limited partnership.

In order to form a limited partnership, a certificate of limited partnership shall be executed and filed with the Commission and shall set forth:

The name of the limited partnership that satisfies the requirements of §

50-73.2

;

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the limited partnership’s initial registered office, the name of the city or county in which it is located, the name of its initial registered agent at that office, and that the agent is either (i) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and either a general partner of the limited partnership, an officer or director of a corporate general partner of the limited partnership, a general partner of a partnership or limited partnership that is a general partner of the limited partnership, a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a general partner of the limited partnership, a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the limited partnership, or a member of the Virginia State Bar or (ii) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

The name and the post office address, including the street and number, if any, of each general partner and, if a general partner is a business entity, the jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated, organized, or formed and, if the general partner is of record with the Commission, the identification number issued by the Commission to such general partner; and

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the principal office of the limited partnership, which may be the same as the registered office but need not be within the Commonwealth.

The certificate of limited partnership may set forth any other matter that the general partners determine to include therein.

A limited partnership is formed at the time of the filing of the certificate of limited partnership with the Commission unless a later date and time are specified in the certificate of limited partnership as provided by §

50-73.17

if, in either case, there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1993, c. 292; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2003, c. 378; 2007, c. 631; 2010, c. 675; 2013, c. 18.

Cross references.

As to filing certificate with State Corporation Commission, see § 59.1-70.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and deleted former subdivision A 2, which read: “[Repealed]”; redesignated former subdivision A 3 as present subdivision A 2, and in that subdivision inserted “business” prior to “post-office address,” inserted “of the limited partnership,” inserted “of the limited partnership, a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the limited partnership” and substituted “a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “a professional corporation or professional, limited liability company registered under §

54.1-3902

”; redesignated former subdivision A 4 as present subdivision A 3; deleted former subdivisions A 5 through A 10, which read: “[Repealed]”; redesignated former subdivision A 11 as present subdivision A 4; deleted former subdivision A 12, which read: “[Repealed]”; and redesignated former subdivision A 13 as present subdivision A 5.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 378 added “and, if a general partner is a business entity that is of record with the Commission, the identification number issued by the Commission to such general partner” in subdivision A 3.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675 substituted “including the street and number” for “with the street and number” throughout the section; and substituted “principal” for “specified” in subdivision A 4.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 inserted “partnership or limited partnership that is a” preceding “general partner of the limited partnership” in clause (i) of subdivision A 2.

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 50-73.11:1.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 441, cl. 2.

§ 50-73.11:2.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 631, cl. 4.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to effect of conversion, see §

50-73.11:4

.

§ 50-73.11:3.
Conversion of general partnership to limited partnership.

A domestic or foreign general partnership may convert to a limited partnership pursuant to this section.

The terms and conditions of a conversion of a general partnership to a limited partnership shall be approved by the partners in the manner provided in the partnership’s partnership agreement for amendments to the partnership agreement or, if no such provision is made in the partnership agreement, by all of the partners.

After the conversion is approved by the partners, the general partnership shall file a certificate of limited partnership that meets the requirements of §

50-73.11

and includes the following:

The name of the former general partnership and the identification number issued by the Commission to the general partnership, if any;

The jurisdiction under whose law the general partnership was formed immediately prior to the filing of the certificate of limited partnership;

If the former general partnership is registered with the Commission as a registered limited liability partnership, a statement to that effect;

A statement that the conversion of the general partnership to a limited partnership was approved by the partners in accordance with the provisions of subsection B.

History.

2007, c. 631.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 50-73.11:4.
Effect of conversion; entity unchanged.

A general partnership that has been converted to a limited partnership pursuant to §

50-73.11:3

, former §

50-73.11:1

, or former §

50-73.125

shall be deemed for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

When such conversion takes effect:

The title to real estate and other property owned by the converting general partnership remains vested in the converted limited partnership;

All obligations of the converting general partnership continue as obligations of the converted limited partnership; and

An action or proceeding pending against the converting general partnership may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred.

A general partner who becomes a limited partner as a result of the conversion remains liable as a general partner for an obligation incurred by the general partnership before the conversion takes effect. If the other party to a transaction with the limited partnership reasonably believes when entering the transaction that the limited partner is a general partner, the limited partner is liable for an obligation incurred by the limited partnership within 90 days after the conversion takes effect. The limited partner’s liability for all other obligations of the limited partnership incurred after the conversion takes effect is that of a limited partner as provided in this chapter.

If the converting general partnership is formed under the laws of the Commonwealth and is registered with the Commission as a registered limited liability partnership at the time of conversion, the registration as a registered limited liability partnership shall continue as to the converted limited partnership upon the effective date and time of the conversion.

History.

2007, c. 631.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 50-73.12.
Amendment of certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership is amended by filing with the Commission a certificate of amendment setting forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing of the initial certificate of limited partnership; and

The amendment to the certificate.

Within 30 days after the happening of any of the following events, an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership reflecting the occurrence of the event or events shall be filed:

The admission of a new general partner;

The withdrawal of a general partner;

The continuation of the business under §

50-73.49

after an event of withdrawal of a general partner;

A change in the name of the limited partnership or the address of the principal office; or

One or more liquidating trustees commence the winding up of the affairs of the limited partnership, in which event the certificate of amendment shall include the name and the business, residence or mailing address of each liquidating trustee.

A general partner who becomes aware that any material statement in a certificate of limited partnership was false when made or that any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the certificate inaccurate in any material respect, shall promptly amend the certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose the general partners determine.

An amendment to a certificate of limited partnership may delete the name of the initial registered agent or the address of the initial registered office if a statement of change described in §

50-73.5

is on file with the Commission.

If an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership is filed in compliance with subsection B of this section, no person shall be subject to liability because the amendment was not filed earlier.

A restated certificate of limited partnership may be executed and filed in the same manner as a certificate of amendment.

A liquidating trustee shall not be subject to liability as a general partner by reason of the execution and filing of a certificate of amendment required by this section.

Upon the effective date and time of a certificate of amendment as provided by §

50-73.17

, the certificate of limited partnership shall be amended as set forth therein.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1990, c. 343; 1993, c. 292; 2007, c. 631; 2008, c. 586; 2010, c. 675.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631, in subsection A, substituted “filing with the” for “filing in the office of the” and “certificate of amendment setting forth” for “certificate of amendment thereof as set forth in §

50-73.17

. The certificate of amendment shall set forth”; substituted “30 days” for “thirty days”; deleted former subdivision B 1, which read: “[Repealed.]”; redesignated former subdivisions B 2 through B 6 as present subdivisions B 1 through B 5; and added subsection H.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, redesignated former subsections E through H as subsections F through I, respectively; and inserted subsection E.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675 substituted “principal” for “specified” in subdivision B 4; and substituted “or the address” for “and the address” in subsection E.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 50-73.13.
Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 586, cl. 2, effective April 1, 2009.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to cancellation of certificate, see §§

50-73.52:4

through

50-73.52:6

.

§ 50-73.14.
Repealed by Acts 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.15.
Execution of documents; penalty.

Certificates and articles required or permitted by this chapter to be filed with the Commission by a limited partnership shall be executed in the following manner:

An initial certificate of limited partnership and an amended and restated certificate of limited partnership pursuant to §

50-73.77

shall be signed by all general partners;

A certificate of amendment shall be signed (i) by at least one general partner or, if all general partners have withdrawn and all of the limited partners agree to continue the business of the limited partnership pursuant to subdivision A 3 of §

50-73.49

, by all limited partners, and by each person designated in the certificate as a new general partner or (ii) after the dissolution of a limited partnership but before the filing of a certificate of cancellation, if all general partners have withdrawn or if the general partners named in the certificate of limited partnership are not winding up the affairs of the limited partnership, by each liquidating trustee;

A certificate of cancellation shall be signed by all general partners, or, if the general partners are not winding up the affairs of the limited partnership, then by all liquidating trustees or a majority of the limited partners; and

Articles of merger shall be signed by at least one general partner.

Every person executing a document required or permitted by this chapter to be filed with the Commission shall sign it and set forth beneath or opposite his signature his name and the capacity in which he signs. A signature on any document filed under this chapter may be a facsimile. Any person may sign a certificate by an attorney-in-fact.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sign a document he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Commission for filing. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The acknowledgment before July 1, 1981, of a certificate or amended certificate of limited partnership, not false or misleading in any material respect, shall be deemed substantial compliance in good faith with any requirement that the certificate or amended certificate be signed or sworn to. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any litigation, pending or decided, on or before the effective date hereof.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1990, c. 343; 1993, c. 292; 2002, c. 441; 2007, c. 631; 2008, c. 586; 2010, c. 675; 2013, c. 18.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441 added the first two sentences in subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 inserted “or statement” preceding “by a general partner” in subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, in subsection A, rewrote the introductory paragraph, which read: “Each certificate required or permitted by this article to be filed as specified in §§

50-73.11

through

50-73.13

and articles of merger referred to in §

50-73.48:3

shall be executed in the following manner”; in subdivision A 2, deleted “by” preceding the clause (i) designation and inserting “by following “(i),” deleted “as provided in § 50-70.13” following “a certificate of cancellation” near the middle and inserted “by” preceding “each liquidating trustee” near the end; and in subsection B, substituted “required or permitted by this chapter to be filed with the Commission shall sign it and set forth” for “shall sign it and state” in the first sentence, and substituted “A signature on any document filed under this chapter” for “Any signature” in the second sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675 substituted “Articles” for “The articles” in subdivision A 4; substituted “signs” for “executes the document” at the end of the first sentence in subsection B; and rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “The execution of a certificate or statement by a general partner constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that the facts stated therein are true.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 inserted “or, if all general partners have withdrawn and all of the limited partners agree to continue the business of the limited partnership pursuant to subdivision A 3 of §

50-73.49

, by all limited partners,” and substituted “each person designated” for “each other general partner designated” in clause (i) of subdivision A 2.

§ 50-73.16.
Execution by judicial act.

If a person required by §

50-73.15

to execute any certificate fails or refuses to do so, any other person, who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal, may petition any circuit court, with general equity jurisdiction in the city or county where the office of the registered agent is located, to direct the execution of the certificate. If the court finds that it is proper for the certificate to be executed and that any person so designated has failed or refused to execute the certificate, it shall order the plaintiff to prepare and file with the Commission an appropriate certificate.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.17.
Filing; fees; effective time and date.

One signed copy of the certificate of limited partnership, of any amended and restated certificate referred to in §

50-73.77

, of any certificate of amendment or cancellation, of any restated certificate of limited partnership or of any articles of merger shall be delivered to the Commission for filing and shall be accompanied by the required filing fee.
A. 1. One signed copy of the certificate of limited partnership, of any amended and restated certificate referred to in §

50-73.77

, of any certificate of amendment or cancellation, of any restated certificate of limited partnership or of any articles of merger shall be delivered to the Commission for filing and shall be accompanied by the required filing fee.

Any document delivered to the Commission for filing shall be typewritten or printed in black. Photocopies, or other reproduced copies, of typewritten or printed certificates may be filed. In every case, information in the document shall be legible and the document shall be capable of being reformatted and reproduced in copies of archival quality.

The document shall be in the English language. A limited partnership name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals. The certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement, duly authenticated by the official having custody of the applicable records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law the limited partnership is formed, which is required of foreign limited partnerships, need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

If, pursuant to any provision of this chapter, the Commission has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, the document shall be in or on the prescribed form.

A person who executes a certificate as an agent or fiduciary need not exhibit evidence of his authority as a prerequisite to filing. If the Commission finds that the certificate complies with the provisions of this chapter, that it has been signed as required by this chapter, and that the required filing fee has been paid, it shall file the certificate and admit it to record in its office.

The Commission may accept the electronic filing of any information required or permitted to be filed by this chapter and may prescribe the methods of execution, recording, reproduction and certification of electronically filed information pursuant to § 59.1-496.

The Commission shall charge and collect the following fees, except as provided in §

12.1-21.2

:

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $10:

An application to reserve or to renew the reservation of a name for use by a domestic or a foreign limited partnership;

A notice of the transfer of a name reserved for the use by a domestic or a foreign limited partnership; and

A certificate declaring withdrawal referred to in §

50-73.25

.

Articles of merger;

A copy of an instrument of merger of a foreign limited partnership holding a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A copy of an instrument of entity conversion of a foreign limited partnership holding a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A certificate of cancellation; and

An application for cancellation of a foreign limited partnership.

A certificate filed with or issued by the Commission pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is effective at the time such certificate is filed or issued unless the certificate or articles to which the certificate relates are filed on behalf of a limited partnership and state that they shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the certificate or articles. In that event, the certificate shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the certificate is filed with or issued by the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified. Any other document filed with the Commission shall be effective when accepted for filing unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.
C. 1. A certificate filed with or issued by the Commission pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is effective at the time such certificate is filed or issued unless the certificate or articles to which the certificate relates are filed on behalf of a limited partnership and state that they shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the certificate or articles. In that event, the certificate shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the certificate is filed with or issued by the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified. Any other document filed with the Commission shall be effective when accepted for filing unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.

Notwithstanding subdivision 1, any certificate that has a delayed effective time or date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, a statement of cancellation signed by each party to which the certificate relates is delivered to the Commission for filing. If the Commission finds that the statement of cancellation complies with the requirements of law, it shall, by order, cancel the certificate.

A statement of cancellation shall contain:

Notwithstanding subdivision 1, for purposes of §§

50-73.2

and

50-73.56

, any certificate that has a delayed effective date shall be deemed to be effective when the certificate is filed or, in the case of a certificate of merger, issued.

For certificates with a delayed effective date and time, the effective date and time shall be Eastern Time.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Commission shall have the power to act upon a petition filed by a limited partnership at any time to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors and of filings made by a person without authority to act for the limited partnership.

2.

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $100:

a.

A certificate of limited partnership;

b.

An application for registration as a foreign limited partnership; and

c.

An amended and restated certificate of limited partnership referred to in §

50-73.77

.

3.

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $25:

a.

A certificate of amendment;

b.

A restated certificate of limited partnership;

c.

A copy of an amendment or correction referred to in §

50-73.57

, or an amended application referred to in §

50-73.57

, provided that an amended application shall not require a separate fee when it is filed with a copy of an amendment or a correction referred to in § 50-73.57;

4.

For issuing a certificate pursuant to §

50-73.76:1

, the fee shall be $6.

a.

The name of the limited partnership;

b.

The name of the certificate and the date on which the certificate was filed with or issued by the Commission;

c.

The time and date on which the Commission’s certificate becomes effective; and

d.

A statement that the certificate is being canceled in accordance with this section.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1991, c. 434; 1992, c. 575; 1993, c. 292; 1995, cc. 70, 368; 2000, c. 995; 2002, c. 441; 2004, c. 274; 2007, cc. 631, 771; 2008, c. 586; 2012, c. 130; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 995 added “pursuant to § 59.1-518” at the end of the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441, in subsection A, added the subdivision designations and inserted subdivision 3; in subdivision A 2, substituted “Any document delivered to the Commission for filing” for “The certificate shall be in the English language and” and deleted “ink” following “black”; and substituted “§

50-73.130

” for “§ 50-37.3” in subdivision C 5.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 substituted “$10” for “ten dollars” in subdivision C 1; deleted former paragraph C 1 f, which read: “An instrument of merger referred to in §

50-73.57:2

”; substituted “$50” for “fifty dollars” in the introductory paragraph of subdivision C 3; rewrote subdivision C 4; and substituted “$6” for “six dollars” in subdivision C 5.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendment by c. 771 substituted “§

50-73.76:1

” for “§

50-73.130

” in subdivision B 5 (now B 4).

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, deleted the last sentence in subdivision A 5, which read: “A signature on any document filed under this chapter may be a facsimile”; inserted “and” at the end of subparagraph B 2 b; substituted the present provisions for “A certificate of correction” in subparagraph B 3 c; substituted “§

50-73.57:3

” for “§

50-73.13

” in subparagraph B 3 g; rewrote subdivision C 2; and inserted “or, in the case of a certificate of merger, issued” at the end of subdivision C 3.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130, in subsection B, added “except as provided in §

12.1-21.2

” at the end of the introductory paragraph; deleted “referred to in §

50-73.11

or

50-73.11:3

” at the end of subdivision 2 a; deleted “referred to in §

50-73.12

” from the end of subdivisions 3 a and 3 b; deleted “referred to in § 73.48:3” from the end of subdivision 3 d; rewrote subdivisions 3 e and 3 f; deleted “referred to in §

50-73.52:4

” in subdivision 3 g; rewrote subdivision 3 h; deleted “of this subsection” following “subdivision 1” in subdivisions C 2 and C 3; and added subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision C 1, substituted “or date specified in the certificate or articles” for “and date” and added the third sentence; rewrote subdivision C 2, which read: “Notwithstanding subdivision 1, as to any certificate that has a delayed effective time and date if, prior to the effective time and date, a party to which the certificate relates files a request for cancellation with the Commission, the Commission shall cancel the certificate and it shall not become effective”; and inserted new subdivisions C 3 and 5 and redesignated former subdivision C 3 as subdivision C 4. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Effective date of amendment. —

Mother failed to admit her revocable trust as an additional general partner in a limited partnership as she did not file a certificate of amendment within 30 days as required by §

50-73.12

; athough the mother attempted to correct the situation by filing an amended certificate within 30 days of executing a later declaration and giving it a retroactive effective date, this also was ineffective as under §

50-73.17

, certificates of limited partnership were amended upon the filing of the certificate of amendment. Smith v. Smith, 81 Va. Cir. 135, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 114 (Fairfax County Aug. 25, 2010).

§ 50-73.18.
Liability for false statement in certificate.

If any certificate filed pursuant to this chapter contains a false or inaccurate statement, one who suffers loss by reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from:

Any person who executes the certificate, or causes another to execute it on his behalf, and knew, and any general partner who knew or should have known, the statement to be false in any material respect at the time the certificate was executed; and

Any general partner who thereafter knows or should have known that any arrangement or other fact described in the certificate has changed, making the statement inaccurate in any material respect, if that general partner had sufficient time to cancel or amend the certificate, or to file a petition for its cancellation or amendment under §

50-73.16

before the statement was reasonably relied upon.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.19.
Scope of notice.

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership has been filed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or the Virginia Uniform Limited Partnership Act, Chapter 2 (§

50-44

et seq.) of this title, as it existed prior to its repeal, is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and that a person designated as a general partner is a general partner, but shall not be deemed to be notice of any other fact.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

Editor’s note.

Chapter 2 (§

50-44

et seq.) referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 607. See now the Virginia Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.).

§ 50-73.20.
Delivery of certificates to limited partners.

Upon the filing with the clerk of the Commission, pursuant to §

50-73.17

, of a certificate, the general partners shall promptly deliver or mail a true copy of the certificate of limited partnership to each limited partner unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1991, c. 434.

§ 50-73.21.
Assumed or fictitious names.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, no partnership organized under this chapter which is conducting or transacting business in this Commonwealth under the name of the partnership set forth in a certificate filed pursuant to §

50-73.17

, nor any partner of that limited partnership, shall be required to file any assumed or fictitious name or comparable certificate solely for such conduct or transaction of partnership business.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.